Illinois, session 104th, SB2075.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 10. The Cycle Rider Safety Training Act is amended 5by changing Sections 2.01, 2.03, 4, and 7 and by adding Section 62.03a as follows: 7    (625 ILCS 35/2.01)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 802.01)8    Sec. 2.01. "Cycle" means a motorcycle, motor driven cycle 9or moped, as defined in The Illinois Vehicle Code.10(Source: P.A. 96-554, eff. 1-1-10.) 11    (625 ILCS 35/2.03)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 802.03)12    Sec. 2.03. "Cycle Rider Safety Training Courses" and 13"Courses" mean courses of instruction in the use and operation 14of cycles, including instruction in the safe on-road operation 15of cycles, the rules of the road and the laws of this State 16relating to motor vehicles, which courses meet the minimum 17requirements of this Act, the standards established in the 18model national administrative standards for state motorcycle 19rider training programs by the National Highway Traffic Safety 20Administration, and the rules and regulations issued hereunder 21by the Department and which have been approved or denied 22within 60 days by the Department as meeting such requirements.  SB2075 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08878 LNS 18933 b1(Source: P.A. 82-649.) 2    (625 ILCS 35/2.03a new)3    Sec. 2.03a. Cycle Rider Safety Training Course Provider. 4"Cycle Rider Safety Training Course Provider" and "provider" 5means a community college, State university, State or local 6government agency, or for-profit or nonprofit business entity 7in good standing and operating in the State that is capable of 8providing courses meeting the definition in this Act in 9accordance with the rules set forth by the Department and the 10regulations of this Act. "Cycle Rider Safety Training Course 11Provider" and "provider" does not include any business 12registered as a motorcycle dealer with the Secretary of State 13or any other business that derives income from the selling of 14motorcycles or has motorcycles for sale at its place of 15business on a consignment basis. 16    (625 ILCS 35/4)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 804)17    Sec. 4. Cycle Rider Safety Training Courses. 18    (a) The Department shall, on an as needed basis, put out 19notices to the public seeking Cycle Rider Safety Training 20Course Providers to provide courses in this State. Such 21courses shall be open to all residents of the State who hold a 22currently valid driver's license and who have reached their 2316th birthday before the first day of the course to be held. 24Such courses may be offered throughout the calendar year.  SB2075 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08878 LNS 18933 b1    Providers may charge a nominal registration fee set by the 2Department, which shall be refunded upon completion of the 3course.4    Responses from potential providers shall include, at a 5minimum, the location where classes are to be held at, the 6number of students they intend to train, whether they would be 7providing motorcycles or using motorcycles provided by the 8program, and the cost for courses provided on a per student 9basis.10    Contracts shall be awarded by the Department to providers 11based on training needs and cost effectiveness of each bid or 12proposal as well as the provider's organizational capacity to 13satisfactorily discharge Cycle Rider Safety Training Courses.14    (b) A provider shall only be paid grant funds under one of 15the following conditions:16        (1) a course was held, in which case the provider 17    shall be paid per student rate multiplied by the number of 18    students present on the first day of the course;19        (2) expenses submitted related to the maintenance of 20    program equipment; or21        (3) submitting other non-personnel expenses as deemed 22    appropriate by the Department.23    (c) A provider awarded a contract with grant funding under 24this Act shall:25        (1) submit proof to the Department that each 26    instructor employed by the provider meets the   SB2075 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08878 LNS 18933 b1    qualifications to teach the curriculum for the courses;2        (2) have at least one employee on staff certified to 3    do quality assurance or quality control visits where 4    instructors are evaluated per curriculum standards on 5    teaching;6        (3) perform at least one quality assurance or quality 7    control visit on each instructor employed during the year 8    and submit the results of those visits to the Department;9        (4) maintain appropriate liability insurance to cover 10    training activities;11        (5) submit requests for payment in a timely manner; 12    and13        (6) adhere to additional program rules and regulations 14    as determined by the Department.15    (d) A provider awarded a contract with grant funding under 16this Act shall not adopt any policy, requirement, or 17expectation regarding employee's manner of dress outside of 18the employee's scheduled work hours, nor may the provider pose 19any questions regarding such on job applications or during 20interviews with potential employees. 21Any State or community college, State university or community 22agency designated by the Department may organize a Regional 23Cycle Rider Safety Training Center and may offer cycle rider 24safety training courses through such Training Centers which it 25operates. The curriculum and accreditation for the courses, 26and the geographic areas in which each Training Center may   SB2075 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 08878 LNS 18933 b1offer the courses, shall be provided for by rules and 2regulations of the Department. Instructors of such courses 3shall meet the qualification and certification requirements of 4the regulations of the Department and the college, university 5or community agency offering the program and may be employed 6on a calendar year rather than a school year basis. Such 7courses shall be open to all residents of the State who hold a 8currently valid driver's license and who have reached their 916th birthday without regard to whether such person is 10enrolled in any other course offered by said State or 11community college, State university or community agency. Such 12courses may be offered throughout the calendar year. The 13courses may be offered as credit or noncredit courses, but no 14fee shall be charged except for a nominal registration fee 15which shall be refunded upon completion of the course.16(Source: P.A. 86-1005.) 17    (625 ILCS 35/7)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 807)18    Sec. 7. The Department is authorized to and shall award 19contracts out of appropriations to the Department from "The 20Cycle Rider Safety Training Fund" to qualifying providers 21Regional Cycle Rider Safety Training Centers for the conduct 22of approved Cycle Rider Safety Training courses.23(Source: P.A. 82-649.) 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 251, 2026.